Oklahoma, session 2025, SB693.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 15 O.S. 2021, Section 753, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 368, O.S.L. 2023 (15 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 753), is amended to read as follows:


Req. No. 1856 Page 1

Section 753. A person engages in a practice which is declared
to be unlawful under the Oklahoma Consumer Protection Act when, in
the course of the person’s business, the person:
1. Represents, knowingly or with reason to know, that the
subject of a consumer transaction is of a particular make or brand,
when it is of another;
2. Makes a false or misleading representation, knowingly or
with reason to know, as to the source, sponsorship, approval, or
certification of the subject of a consumer transaction;
3. Makes a false or misleading representation, knowingly or
with reason to know, as to affiliation, connection, association
with, or certification by another;
4. Makes a false or misleading representation or designation,
knowingly or with reason to know, of the geographic origin of the
subject of a consumer transaction;
5. Makes a false representation, knowingly or with reason to
know, as to the characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits,
alterations, or quantities of the subject of a consumer transaction
or a false representation as to the sponsorship, approval, status,
affiliation, or connection of a person therewith;
6. Knowingly or with reason to know, makes a false or
misleading representation or gives the false or misleading
impression of being affiliated with a state agency or an affiliate
of a state agency through advertisement or publication;
Req. No. 1856 Page 2

7. Represents, knowingly or with reason to know, that the
subject of a consumer transaction is original or new if the person
knows that it is reconditioned, reclaimed, used, or secondhand;
8. Represents, knowingly or with reason to know, that the
subject of a consumer transaction is of a particular standard,
style, or model, if it is of another;
9. Advertises, knowingly or with reason to know, the subject of
a consumer transaction with intent not to sell it as advertised;
10. Advertises, knowingly or with reason to know, the subject
of a consumer transaction with intent not to supply reasonably
expected public demand, unless the advertisement discloses a
limitation of quantity;
11. Advertises under the guise of obtaining sales personnel
when in fact the purpose is to sell the subject of a consumer
transaction to the sales personnel applicants;
12. Makes false or misleading statements of fact, knowingly or
with reason to know, concerning the price of the subject of a
consumer transaction or the reason for, existence of, or amounts of
price reduction;
13. Employs “bait and switch” advertising, which consists of an
offer to sell the subject of a consumer transaction which the seller
does not intend to sell, which advertising is accompanied by one or
more of the following practices:

Req. No. 1856 Page 3

a. refusal to show the subject of a consumer transaction
advertised,
b. disparagement of the advertised subject of a consumer
transaction or the terms of sale,
c. requiring undisclosed tie-in sales or other
undisclosed conditions to be met prior to selling the
advertised subject of a consumer transaction,
d. refusal to take orders for the subject of a consumer
transaction advertised for delivery within a
reasonable time,
e. showing or demonstrating defective subject of a
consumer transaction which the seller knows is
unusable or impracticable for the purpose set forth in
the advertisement,
f. accepting a deposit for the subject of a consumer
transaction and subsequently charging the buyer for a
higher priced item, or
g. willful failure to make deliveries of the subject of a
consumer transaction within a reasonable time or to
make a refund therefor upon the request of the
purchaser;
14. Conducts a closing out sale without having first obtained a
license as required in the Oklahoma Consumer Protection Act;

Req. No. 1856 Page 4

15. Resumes the business for which the closing out sale was
conducted within thirty-six (36) months from the expiration date of
the closing out sale license;
16. Falsely states, knowingly or with reason to know, that
services, replacements, or repairs are needed;
17. Violates any provision of the Oklahoma Health Spa Act;
18. Violates any provision of the Home Repair Fraud Act;
19. Violates any provision of the Consumer Consumers Disclosure
of Prizes and Gifts Act;
20. Violates any provision of Section 755.1 of this title or
Section 1847a of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
21. Commits an unfair or deceptive trade practice as defined in
Section 752 of this title;
22. Violates any provision of Section 169.1 of Title 8 Section
7111 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes in fraudulently or
intentionally failing or refusing to honor the contract to provide
certain cemetery services specified in the contract entered into
pursuant to the Perpetual Care Fund Act;
23. Misrepresents a mail solicitation as an invoice or as a
billing statement;
24. Offers to purchase a mineral or royalty interest through an
offer that resembles an oil and gas lease and that the consumer
believed was an oil and gas lease;

Req. No. 1856 Page 5

25. Refuses to honor gift certificates, warranties, or any
other merchandise offered by a person in a consumer transaction
executed prior to the closing of the business of the person without
providing a purchaser a means of redeeming such merchandise or
ensuring the warranties offered will be honored by another person;
26. Knowingly causes a charge to be made by any billing method
to a consumer for services which the person knows was not authorized
in advance by the consumer;
27. Knowingly causes a charge to be made by any billing method
to a consumer for a product or products which the person knows was
not authorized in advance by the consumer;
28. Violates Section 752A of this title;
29. Makes deceptive use of another’s name in notification or
solicitation, as defined in Section 752 of this title;
30. Falsely states or implies that any person, product, or
service is recommended or endorsed by a named third person;
31. Falsely states that information about the consumer,
including, but not limited to, the name, address, or phone number of
the consumer, has been provided by a third person, whether that
person is named or unnamed;
32. Acting as a debt collector, contacts a debtor and threatens
to file a suit against the debtor over a debt barred by the statute
of limitations which has passed for filing suit for such debt; or

Req. No. 1856 Page 6

33. Acting as a debt collector, contacts a debtor and uses
obscene or profane language to collect a debt; or
34. Violates any provision of Section 3 of this act.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-311.1 of Title 43A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a fund for the
Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services to be
designated the “Social Media Mitigation for Minor Mental Health
Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal
year limitations, and shall consist of all monies generated by
additional civil penalties ordered by the court against social media
platforms pursuant to Section 3 of this act. All monies accruing to
the credit of the fund shall be appropriated at the discretion of
the Legislature for the purpose of funding mental health services
for children under eighteen (18) years of age.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 202 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Social media platform” means a website or internet medium
that:
a. permits a person to become a registered user,
establish an account, or create a profile for the
Req. No. 1856 Page 7

purpose of allowing users to create, share, and view
user-generated content through such an account or
profile,
b. enables one or more users to generate content that can
be viewed by other users of the medium, and
c. primarily serves as a medium for users to interact
with content generated by other users of the medium;
and
2. “User” means a person who accesses or uses a social media
platform.
B. A social media platform shall prominently display a warning
to any user who accesses the platform for the first time and to any
established user once per day. The warning shall appear for a
duration of sixty (60) seconds, shall render the applications of the
platform unusable for such duration, and shall not be able to be
terminated by the user before the end of such duration. The warning
shall display the following message: “WARNING. THERE IS REASONABLE
EVIDENCE TO SUGGEST THAT SOCIAL MEDIA IS HAZARDOUS TO MENTAL HEALTH,
ESPECIALLY IN YOUNG CHILDREN, TEENAGERS, AND YOUNG ADULTS.”
C. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a text
messaging platform or a platform for which the primary purpose is
related to education or health care.
D. Any violation of this section shall constitute an unlawful
business practice and shall be subject to the provisions of the
Req. No. 1856 Page 8

Okla homa Consumer Protection Act. In addition to civil penalties
provided for in subsection C of Section 761.1 of Title 15 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, the court may order an additional civil penalty
of up to Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per violation to be
deposited into the Social Media Mitigation for Minor Mental Health
Fund established in Section 2 of this act.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-1856 CN 3/17/2025 2:24:55 PM















Req. No. 1856 Page 9